North Carolina, session 2025, SB876.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
PART I. ROWAN COUNTY BOARD OF COMMISSIONERS VACANCIES
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 153A-27.1(h) reads as rewritten:
"(h) This section shall apply only in the following counties: Alamance, Alexander,
Alleghany, Avery, Beaufort, Brunswick, Buncombe, Cabarrus, Caldwell, Carteret, Caswell,
Cherokee, Clay, Cleveland, Cumberland, Dare, Davidson, Davie, Forsyth, Graham, Guilford,
Harnett, Haywood, Henderson, Hyde, Jackson, Lee, Lincoln, Macon, Madison, McDowell,
Mecklenburg, Moore, Onslow, Pender, Polk, Randolph, Rockingham, Rowan, Rutherford,
Sampson, Stanly, Stokes, Transylvania, and Yancey."
SECTION 1.(b) This section applies to Rowan County only.
SECTION 1.(c) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
vacancies filled on or after that date.
PART II. KANNAPOLIS ETJ RELINQUISHMENT
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 160D-202(h) reads as rewritten:
"(h) Relinquishment of Jurisdiction. – When a city relinquishes jurisdiction over an area
that it is regulating under this Chapter to a county, the city development regulations and powers
of enforcement shall remain in effect until (i) the county has adopted such development
regulation or (ii) a period of 60 90 days has elapsed following the action by which the city
relinquished jurisdiction, whichever is sooner. Prior to the transfer of jurisdiction, the county
may hold hearings and take other measures consistent with G.S. 160D-204 that may be required
in order to adopt and apply its development regulations for the area at the same time it assumes
jurisdiction."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 160D-601(d) shall not apply to the adoption of development
regulations by the County of Rowan establishing jurisdiction over an area after relinquishment
of jurisdiction by the City of Kannapolis over that area in accordance with G.S. 160D-202, as
amended by this act.
SECTION 2.(c) This section applies only to Rowan County.
SECTION 2.(d) This section is effective when it becomes law and expires October
1, 2026.
PART III. CITY OF KANNAPOLIS – PARTISAN EVEN-NUMBERED YEAR
ELECTIONS
SECTION 3.(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 163-279 and the Charter of the City of
Kannapolis as adopted by the Kannapolis Charter Commission on December 11, 1984, regular
municipal elections shall be held at the time of the general election in each even-numbered year.
Except as otherwise provided, the election shall be held and conducted in accordance with the
uniform municipal election laws of North Carolina with the primary and election held and
conducted in accordance with the general laws governing primaries and elections for county
*S876-v-7*

officers. The Mayor and members of the City Council shall be elected on a partisan basis. Any
candidate seeking nomination by petition for municipal office shall comply with the requirements
of Article 11 of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes of North Carolina, except that the date and
time petitions must be filed with the county board of elections shall be in accordance with
G.S. 163-122(a)(3).
SECTION 3.(b) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the City of Kannapolis
in 2027. The terms of office for the three council members serving on the effective date of this
section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by one year. The terms of office
for the Mayor and three council members serving on the effective date of this section whose
terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be extended by one year. Regular municipal elections in the
City of Kannapolis shall resume in even-numbered years beginning in 2028 with the same
staggering of terms as when elections were conducted in odd-numbered years.
PART IV. CITY OF ALBEMARLE – PARTISAN ELECTIONS
SECTION 4.(a) Section 3.1 of the Charter of the City of Albemarle, being Chapter
259 of the 1979 Session Laws, as amended by S.L. 2015-253 and Ordinance 19-35 adopted on
October 7, 2019, reads as rewritten:
"Section 3.1. Regular Municipal Elections; Conduct and Method of Election. Elections (a)
Regular municipal elections shall be held at the time of the general election in each
even-numbered year. Except as otherwise provided, the election shall be held and conducted in
accordance with the uniform municipal election laws of North Carolina. The Mayor and members
of the City Council shall be elected according to the nonpartisan plurality method as provided in
G.S. 163-292.on a partisan basis. The primary and election shall be held and conducted in
accordance with the general laws governing primaries and elections for county officers.
(b) Any candidate seeking nomination by petition for municipal office shall comply with
the requirements of Article 11 of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes of North Carolina, except
that the date and time petitions must be filed with the county board of elections shall be in
accordance with G.S. 163-122(a)(3)."
SECTION 4.(b) Section 2.2 of the Charter of the City of Albemarle, being Chapter
259 of the 1979 Session Laws, as amended by Chapter 881 of the 1987 Session Laws and
Ordinance 95-18 adopted on May 1, 1995, reads as rewritten:
"Section 2.2. Council; Composition; Terms of Office. Office; Vacancies. (a) The City
Council shall be composed of seven members, chosen as follows:
(1) three Three shall be nominated and elected by and from the qualified voters
of the City for terms of four years; andCity.
(2) four Four shall be nominated and elected by and from the qualified voters of
the districts, one each from the four electoral districts established under
Section 3.3 of this Charter, in the manner provided by Article III of this
Charter. For the district seats, no person shall be eligible to file for, be elected
to, or serve on the City Council unless the person is a qualified voter and
resident of the electoral district from which the candidate seeks to be elected,
and candidates shall be voted on by the voters residing in the electoral district
from which that candidate seeks election.
(b) Members of the City Council shall be elected for staggered four-year terms.
(c) Vacancies in the City Council shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term
by appointment by the remaining members of the City Council. Notwithstanding G.S. 160A-63,
if the vacating official was elected as the nominee of a political party, then the individual
recommended by the county executive committee of that political party shall be appointed if the
county executive committee makes a recommendation within 30 days of the occurrence of the
vacancy and does either of the following, as applicable:
Page 2 Session Law 2026-25 Senate Bill 876

(1) In the event of For vacancies in the council City Council from a district seat,
the person appointed as a successor under G.S. 160A-63 must be restricts
voting to committee members who reside within the electoral district of the
vacating member and recommends a person who is a resident of the electoral
district.
(2) For vacancies in the City Council from an at-large seat, restricts voting to
committee members who reside within the corporate limits of the City."
SECTION 4.(c) Section 2.3 of the Charter of the City of Albemarle, being Chapter
259 of the 1979 Session Laws, as amended by Ordinance 95-18 adopted on May 1, 1995, reads
as rewritten:
"Section 2.3. Mayor; Term of Office; Duties. Duties; Vacancies. (a) The Mayor shall be
elected by and from the qualified voters of the City in the manner provided by Article III of this
Charter to serve for a term of two four years, or until his successor is elected and qualified. The
Mayor shall be the official head of the City government and shall preside at all meetings of the
Council. The Mayor shall exercise such powers and perform such duties as presently are or
hereafter may be conferred upon him by the General Statutes of North Carolina, by this Charter,
and by the ordinances of the City.
(b) Vacancies in the office of the Mayor shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired
term by appointment of the City Council. Notwithstanding G.S. 160A-63, if the Mayor was
elected as the nominee of a political party, then the individual recommended by the county
executive committee of that political party shall be appointed if the county executive committee
makes a recommendation within 30 days of the occurrence of the vacancy and restricts voting to
committee members who reside within the corporate limits of the City."
SECTION 4.(d) Section 3.2 of the Charter of the City of Albemarle, being Chapter
259 of the 1979 Session Laws, as amended by Chapter 881 of the 1987 Session Laws and S.L.
2015-253, is repealed.
SECTION 4.(e) This section shall not affect the filling of a vacancy that occurs for
the officers in the City of Albemarle for a seat elected prior to the effective date of this section.
SECTION 4.(f) Subsections (a) and (e) of this section become effective at the time
of the organizational meeting held in accordance with G.S. 160A-68 in December 2028. In order
to implement subsections (a) and (e) of this section, the 2028 elections shall be conducted as if
the provisions of this section were already in effect.
PART V. MOORE COUNTY MUNICIPALITIES – PARTISAN EVEN-NUMBERED
YEAR ELECTIONS
TOWN OF ABERDEEN
SECTION 5.1.(a) Article IV of the Charter of the Town of Aberdeen, being Chapter
147 of the 1975 Session Laws, as amended by Chapter 220 of the 1995 Session Laws and by
Ordinance E2018134, adopted on April 23, 2018, reads as rewritten:
"ARTICLE IV. ELECTIONS.
"Sec. 4.1. Regular Municipal Elections. The municipal elections shall be held and conducted
by the Moore County Board of Elections. The regular municipal elections shall be nonpartisan
and decided by simple plurality. The regular elections for municipal offices shall be on Tuesday
after the first Monday in November in 1975 and every two years thereafter. The held at the time
of the general election in each even-numbered year. The Mayor and the members of the Board
of Commissioners shall be elected on a partisan basis. The primary and election shall be held and
conducted in accordance with the general laws governing primaries and elections for county
officers. Except as otherwise provided, elections shall be held and conducted in accordance with
the applicable provisions of Articles 23 and 24 of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes of North
Carolina. Beginning in the regular election to be held in November, 1975, the three candidates
Senate Bill 876 Session Law 2026-25 Page 3

for Commissioner receiving the highest number of votes shall be elected for terms of four years,
and the two candidates receiving the next highest number of votes shall be elected for terms of
two years. Thereafter, as their terms expire, their successors shall be elected for terms of four
years. Beginning in November of 2019, the office of mayor shall be elected for a term of two
years, and thereafter, starting in the election of November 2021 the mayor shall be elected for a
term of four years.
…
"Sec. 4.3. Unaffiliated Candidates. Any candidate seeking nomination by petition for
municipal office shall comply with the requirements of Article 11 of Chapter 163 of the General
Statutes of North Carolina, except that the date and time petitions must be filed with the county
board of elections shall be in accordance with G.S. 163-122(a)(3)."
SECTION 5.1.(b) Section 3.3 of the Charter of the Town of Aberdeen, being Chapter
147 of the 1975 Session Laws, as amended by Ordinance E2018134, adopted on April 23, 2018,
reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 3.4. 3.3. Terms; Qualifications; Vacancies.Qualifications.
(a) The members of the Board of Commissioners shall serve for staggered terms of four
years. The Mayor shall serve for a term of four years as set forth in Article IV, Section 4.1. Their
terms shall begin on the day and hour of the organizational meeting in December, following their
election and they shall serve until their successors are elected and qualify.
(b) No person shall be eligible to be a candidate or be elected as Mayor or as a member
of the Board of Commissioners or to serve in such capacity, unless he is a resident and a qualified
voter of the Town.
(c) In the event a vacancy occurs in the office of Mayor or Commissioner, the Board shall
by majority vote appoint some qualified person to fill the same for the remainder of the unexpired
term."
SECTION 5.1.(c) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of
Aberdeen in 2027. The terms of office for the three commissioners serving on the effective date
of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by one year. The terms of
office for the mayor and two commissioners serving on the effective date of this section whose
terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be extended by one year. Regular municipal elections in the
Town of Aberdeen shall resume in even-numbered years beginning in 2028 with the same
staggering of terms as when elections were conducted in odd-numbered years.
TOWN OF CAMERON
SECTION 5.2.(a) Section 4 of the Charter of the Town of Cameron, being Chapter
14 of the Private Laws of 1876, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 4. There shall be an election (a) Regular municipal elections shall be held for officers
mentioned in this act on the first Monday in May, one thousand eight hundred and seventy-seven,
and each succeeding year thereafter, under the same restrictions that county and State elections
are held; and all citizens within said incorporation, who have resided twelve months within the
State and thirty days within the corporate limits, previous to the day of the election, shall be
entitled to vote at said elections.at the time of the general election in each even-numbered year.
The mayor and the commissioners shall be elected on a partisan basis. The primary and election
shall be held and conducted in accordance with the general laws governing primaries and
elections for county officers. Except as otherwise provided, elections shall be held and conducted
in accordance with the uniform municipal election laws of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes.
(b) Any candidate seeking nomination by petition for municipal office shall comply with
the requirements of Article 11 of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes of North Carolina, except
that the date and time petitions must be filed with the county board of elections shall be in
accordance with G.S. 163-122(a)(3)."
Page 4 Session Law 2026-25 Senate Bill 876

SECTION 5.2.(b) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of
Cameron in 2027. The terms of office for the three commissioners serving on the effective date
of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by one year. The terms of
office for the mayor and the two commissioners serving on the effective date of this section
whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be extended by one year. Regular municipal elections
in the Town of Cameron shall resume in even-numbered years beginning in 2028 with the same
staggering of terms as when elections were conducted in odd-numbered years.
TOWN OF CARTHAGE
SECTION 5.3.(a) Article III of the Charter of the Town of Carthage, being S.L.
1999-239, reads as rewritten:
"ARTICLE III. ELECTIONS.
"Section 3.1. Regular Municipal Elections. Regular municipal elections shall be held at
the time of the general election in each odd-numbered year in accordance with the uniform
municipal election laws of North Carolina. even-numbered year. Elections shall be conducted on
a nonpartisan basis and the results determined using the nonpartisan plurality method as provided
in G.S. 163-292.partisan basis. The primary and election shall be held and conducted in
accordance with the general laws governing primaries and elections for county officers. Except
as otherwise provided, elections shall be held and conducted in accordance with the uniform
municipal election laws of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes.
"Section 3.2. Election of Mayor. A Mayor shall be elected in the regular municipal election
in 1999 and each four years thereafter.
"Section 3.3. Election of Council Members. In the regular municipal election in 1997, the
three candidates for Council member who received the highest numbers of votes shall be elected
for four-year terms, while the two candidates who receive the next highest numbers of votes shall
be elected for two-year terms. In the regular municipal election in 1999, and in each regular
municipal election thereafter, persons shall be elected to serve four-year terms in those positions
whose terms are then expiring.
"Section 3.4. Special Elections and Referenda. Special elections and referenda may be held
only as provided by general law or applicable local acts of the General Assembly.
"Section 3.5. Unaffiliated Candidates. Any candidate seeking nomination by petition for
municipal office shall comply with the requirements of Article 11 of Chapter 163 of the General
Statutes of North Carolina, except that the date and time petitions must be filed with the county
board of elections shall be in accordance with G.S. 163-122(a)(3)."
SECTION 5.3.(b) Section 2.7 of Article II of the Charter of the Town of Carthage,
being S.L. 1999-239, reads as rewritten:
"Section 2.7. Compensation; Qualifications for Office; Vacancies. Office. The
compensation and qualifications of the Mayor and Council members shall be in accordance with
general law. Vacancies that occur in any elective office of the Town shall be filled by majority
vote of the remaining members of the Council."
SECTION 5.3.(c) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of
Carthage in 2027. The terms of office for the mayor and the two council members serving on the
effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by one year.
The terms of office for the three council members serving on the effective date of this section
whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be extended by one year. Regular municipal elections
in the Town of Carthage shall resume in even-numbered years beginning in 2028 with the same
staggering of terms as when elections were conducted in odd-numbered years.
TOWN OF PINEBLUFF
Senate Bill 876 Session Law 2026-25 Page 5

SECTION 5.4.(a) Article III of the Charter of the Town of Pinebluff, being Chapter
243 of the 1979 Session Laws, as amended by Ordinance 1987-3-19, adopted on March 19, 1987,
and by Ordinance 2016-01, adopted on June 16, 2016, reads as rewritten:
"ARTICLE III. ELECTIONS.
"Section 3.1. Regular Municipal Elections; Conduct and Method of Election. Regular
municipal elections shall be held in the Town every two (2) years in odd-numbered years and
shall be conducted in accordance with the uniform municipal election laws of North Carolina. at
the time of the general election in each even-numbered year. The Mayor and members of the
Board of Commissioners shall be elected according to the nonpartisan plurality method of
election, as provided in G.S. 163-292.on a partisan basis. The primary and election shall be held
and conducted in accordance with the general laws governing primaries and elections for county
officers. Except as otherwise provided, elections shall be held and conducted in accordance with
the uniform municipal election laws of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes.
"Section 3.2. Election of the Board of Commissioners; Election of Mayor. At the regular
municipal election in 2017, the Mayor and the two (2) Commissioners receiving the highest
number of votes cast shall be elected to four (4) year terms expiring in 2021. The three (3)
Commissioners receiving the next highest number of votes cast in the 2017 regular municipal
election shall be elected to two (2) year terms, expiring in 2019, at which time the seats held by
said Commissioners shall be subject to election to four (4) year terms at the regular municipal
election 2019. Thereafter, all terms of office for the Commissioners and Mayor shall be four (4)
years.The Mayor shall be elected to serve a four-year term. The Commissioners shall be elected
to serve staggered four-year terms.
"Section 3.3. Unaffiliated Candidates. Any candidate seeking nomination by petition for
municipal office shall comply with the requirements of Article 11 of Chapter 163 of the General
Statutes of North Carolina, except that the date and time petitions must be filed with the county
board of elections shall be in accordance with G.S. 163-122(a)(3)."
SECTION 5.4.(b) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of
Pinebluff in 2027. The terms of office for the three commissioners serving on the effective date
of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by one year. The terms of
office for the mayor and the two commissioners serving on the effective date of this section
whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be extended by one year. Regular municipal elections
in the Town of Pinebluff shall resume in even-numbered years beginning in 2028 with the same
staggering of terms as when elections were conducted in odd-numbered years.
TOWN OF ROBBINS
SECTION 5.5.(a) Section 3 of the Charter of the Town of Robbins, being Chapter
63 of the Private Laws of 1935, as amended by the Order approved by the Municipal Board of
Control on April 1, 1943, and by Chapter 230 of the 1979 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"The officers of the Town of Robbins shall consist of a mayor and five commissioners to be
elected by the qualified voters of said Town at the time prescribed by law for the election of
municipal officers. At the next election for municipal officers, there shall be elected a mayor,
who shall serve for a term of four years, and five commissioners. The two individuals seeking
the office of commissioner who receive the highest number of votes shall be elected for a term
of four years; the three individuals receiving the next highest number of votes shall be elected
for a term of two years. Thereafter, each commissioner shall be elected for a term of four years.on
a partisan basis to serve staggered terms of four years. Regular municipal elections shall be held
at the time of the general election in each even-numbered year. The primary and election shall
be held and conducted in accordance with the general laws governing primaries and elections for
county officers. Except as otherwise provided, the election shall be conducted in accordance with
the uniform municipal election laws in Chapter 163 of the General Statutes.
Page 6 Session Law 2026-25 Senate Bill 876

Any candidate seeking nomination by petition for municipal office shall comply with the
requirements of Article 11 of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes of North Carolina, except that
the date and time petitions must be filed with the county board of elections shall be in accordance
with G.S. 163-122(a)(3)."
SECTION 5.5.(b) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of Robbins
in 2027. The terms of office for the mayor and two commissioners serving on the effective date
of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by one year. The terms of
office for the three commissioners serving on the effective date of this section whose terms are
set to expire in 2029 shall be extended by one year. Regular municipal elections in the Town of
Robbins shall resume in even-numbered years beginning in 2028 with the same staggering of
terms as when elections were conducted in odd-numbered years.
TOWN OF SOUTHERN PINES
SECTION 5.6.(a) Article III of the Charter of the Town of Southern Pines, being
Chapter 352 of the 1981 Session Laws, as amended by Ordinance SP05.502 adopted on
September 12, 1989, reads as rewritten:
"ARTICLE III.
"ELECTIONS.
"Sec. 3.1. Regular Municipal Elections; Conduct and Method of Election.–Regular municipal
elections shall be held in the Town every two years in odd-numbered years and shall be conducted
in accordance with Chapter 163 of the General Statutes. at the time of the general election in each
even-numbered year. Members of the Town Council and the mayor shall be elected according to
the nonpartisan primary and election method of elections, and the results determined in
accordance with G.S. 163-294. That the Mayor of the Town of Southern Pines shall be elected
according to the Non-Partisan Primary and Election Method of Elections, and the results
determined in accordance with the General Statutes of North Carolina Section 163-294.on a
partisan basis. The primary and election shall be held and conducted in accordance with the
general laws governing primaries and elections for county officers. Except as otherwise provided,
elections shall be held and conducted in accordance with the uniform municipal election laws of
Chapter 163 of the General Statutes.
"Sec. 3.2. Election of the Town Council.–At the regular municipal elections in 1991 and
biennially thereafter, there shall be elected four members of the Town Council to fill the seats of
those officers whose terms are then expiring.
"Sec. 3.3. Unaffiliated Candidates. Any candidate seeking nomination by petition for
municipal office shall comply with the requirements of Article 11 of Chapter 163 of the General
Statutes of North Carolina, except that the date and time petitions must be filed with the county
board of elections shall be in accordance with G.S. 163-122(a)(3)."
SECTION 5.6.(b) Section 2.2 of the Charter of the Town of Southern Pines, being
Chapter 352 of the 1981 Session Laws, as amended by Ordinance SP05.502 adopted on
September 12, 1989, and by Ordinance 987 adopted on June 10, 2003, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 2.2. Town Council; Composition; Term of Office. – The Town Council shall consist of
four council members and a mayor, who shall be elected at large by and from the qualified voters
of the Town for terms of four years, except as provided below. To implement four-year staggered
terms for the members of the Town Council, at the regular municipal election to be held in 2003
the two candidates for council member who receive the highest number of votes shall be elected
for four-year terms, while the two candidates for council member who receive the next highest
number of votes shall be elected for two-year terms. At the regular municipal election to be held
in 2005, and every two years thereafter, persons shall be elected to serve four-year terms in those
positions whose terms are then expiring.Town. The mayor shall be elected to serve a four-year
term and council members shall be elected to serve staggered four-year terms."
Senate Bill 876 Session Law 2026-25 Page 7

SECTION 5.6.(c) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of
Southern Pines in 2027. The terms of office for the mayor and the two town council members
serving on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be
extended by one year. The terms of office for the two town council members serving on the
effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be extended by one year.
Regular municipal elections in the Town of Southern Pines shall resume in even-numbered years
beginning in 2028 with the same staggering of terms as when elections were conducted in
odd-numbered years.
TOWN OF TAYLORTOWN
SECTION 5.7.(a) Chapter IV of the Charter of the Town of Taylortown, being
Section 2 of Chapter 601 of the 1987 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Chapter IV.
"Elections.
"Sec. 4.1 Conduct of Town Elections. The Town Council shall be elected on a nonpartisan
basis and the results determined by the plurality method as provided by G.S. 163-292.at the time
of the general election in each even-numbered year on a partisan basis. The primary and election
shall be held and conducted in accordance with the general laws governing primaries and
elections for county officers. Except as otherwise provided, the election shall be conducted in
accordance with the uniform municipal election laws in Chapter 163 of the General Statutes.
"Sec. 4.2 Unaffiliated Candidates. Any candidate seeking nomination by petition for
municipal office shall comply with the requirements of Article 11 of Chapter 163 of the General
Statutes of North Carolina, except that the date and time petitions must be filed with the county
board of elections shall be in accordance with G.S. 163-122(a)(3)."
SECTION 5.7.(b) Section 3.5 of Chapter III of the Charter of the Town of
Taylortown, being Section 2 of Chapter 601 of the 1987 Session Laws, is repealed.
SECTION 5.7.(c) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of
Taylortown in 2027. The terms of office for the five members of the Town Council serving on
the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by one
year. Regular municipal elections in the Town of Taylortown shall resume in even-numbered
years beginning in 2028.
TOWN OF VASS
SECTION 5.8.(a) Section 6 of the Charter of the Town of Vass, being Chapter 407
of the 1907 Private Laws, as amended by Chapter 817 of the 1953 Session Laws, and by
Ordinance 1988-11, adopted on November 9, 1998, is repealed.
SECTION 5.8.(b) The Charter of the Town of Vass, being Chapter 407 of the 1907
Private Laws, as amended by Chapter 817 of the 1953 Session Laws, Chapter 226 of the 1957
Session Laws, and by Ordinance 1988-11, adopted on November 9, 1998, is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"Sec. 6.1. Regular municipal elections shall be held at the time of the general election in each
even-numbered year. Town officers shall be elected on a partisan basis. The primary and election
shall be held and conducted in accordance with the general laws governing primaries and
elections for county officers. Except as otherwise provided, elections shall be held and conducted
in accordance with the uniform municipal election laws of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes.
Any candidate seeking nomination by petition for municipal office shall comply with the
requirements of Article 11 of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes of North Carolina, except that
the date and time petitions must be filed with the county board of elections shall be in accordance
with G.S. 163-122(a)(3)."
Page 8 Session Law 2026-25 Senate Bill 876

SECTION 5.8.(c) Section 3 of the Charter of the Town of Vass, being Chapter 407
of the 1907 Private Laws, as amended by Chapter 226 of the 1957 Session Laws, reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 3. That the officers of said corporation shall consist of a mayor, three commissioners,
town constable and such other officers as the town commissioners may elect for the better
government of said town; and the following named persons shall fill the offices of mayor and
commissioners from their qualifications until the first Monday in May, one thousand nine
hundred and seven, and until their successors be elected and qualified, viz.: Mayor, Alex.
Gunthur; Commissioners, J. A. Leslie, T. J. Smith and W. B. Graham. The Mayor and
Commissioners shall take office at the first regular board meeting following the election.The
governing body shall consist of a Mayor and five Commissioners. The Mayor shall serve for a
term of two years. The Commissioners shall serve for staggered four-year terms."
SECTION 5.8.(d) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of Vass
in 2027. The terms of office for the mayor and the three commissioners serving on the effective
date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by one year. The
terms of office for the two commissioners serving on the effective date of this section whose
terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be extended by one year. Regular municipal elections in the
Town of Vass shall resume in even-numbered years beginning in 2028 with the same staggering
of terms as when elections were conducted in odd-numbered years.
VILLAGE OF FOXFIRE VILLAGE
SECTION 5.9.(a) Article IV of the Charter of Foxfire Village, being Chapter 237 of
the 1977 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"ARTICLE IV.
"ELECTIONS.
"Sec. 4.1. Conduct of Village Elections. The Village elections shall be non-partisan and the
results determined by a plurality of the votes cast, as provided by G.S. 163-292. The regular
municipal election shall be held as provided in G.S. 163-279(a)(1) and the applicable provisions
of Articles 23 and 24 of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes.Municipal elections shall be held at
the time of the general election in each even-numbered year. Village officers shall be elected on
a partisan basis. The primary and election shall be held and conducted in accordance with the
general laws governing primaries and elections for county officers. Except as otherwise provided,
elections shall be held and conducted in accordance with the uniform municipal election laws of
Chapter 163 of the General Statutes.
…
"Sec. 4.3. Unaffiliated Candidates. Any candidate seeking nomination by petition for
municipal office shall comply with the requirements of Article 11 of Chapter 163 of the General
Statutes of North Carolina, except that the date and time petitions must be filed with the county
board of elections shall be in accordance with G.S. 163-122(a)(3)."
SECTION 5.9.(b) Article III of the Charter of Foxfire Village, being Chapter 237 of
the 1977 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"ARTICLE III.
"GOVERNING BODY.
"Sec. 3.1. Temporary Officers. Until the regular municipal election to be held in November
1977, Robert M. Cooper, George Anderson, Ralph Olmstead, Katie McWilliams, and Joseph N.
Donovan are hereby appointed to act as the council of Foxfire Village, and they shall possess and
may exercise the powers granted to the Village Council until their successors are elected and
qualify. They shall appoint one member as mayor.
"Sec. 3.2. Structure of Governing Body, Number of Members. The governing body of Foxfire
Village is the Village Council, which has five members.
Senate Bill 876 Session Law 2026-25 Page 9

"Sec. 3.3. Manner of Election of Council. The qualified voters of the entire Village shall elect
the members of the Council. The municipal election shall be held and conducted by the County
Board of Elections.
"Sec. 3.4. Term of Office of the Members of the Council. (a) Except for the temporary
officers provided for in Section 3.1 of this Charter, and except as provided in Subsection (b), of
this Section of the Charter, the The members of the Village Council shall be elected for staggered
four-year terms.
(b) At the regular municipal election in 1977, the three persons receiving the highest
number of votes for seats on the Council shall be elected to four-year terms; the two persons
receiving the next highest number of votes for seats on the Council shall be elected to two-year
terms. Beginning at the regular municipal election to be held in 1979, and every four years
thereafter, two persons shall be elected to seats on the Council and shall serve four-year terms.
Beginning at the regular municipal election to be held in 1981, and every four years thereafter,
three persons shall be elected to seats on the Council and shall serve four-year terms.
"Sec. 3.5. Election of the Mayor, Term of Office. At the organizational meetings of the
Council following each regular municipal election, the Council shall elect one of its members to
serve as its Mayor. The Mayor shall serve as such at the pleasure of the Council.
"Sec. 3.6. Vacancies. Any vacancy in the office of Mayor shall be filled by appointment of
the Council and the person appointed shall serve at the pleasure of the Council.
If a vacancy for any reason occurs on the Council, the remaining members shall, within 30
days, appoint a qualified voter to fill the vacancy as provided herein. If the vacancy occurs in the
first two years of a four-year term, and more than 30 days prior to the regular municipal election,
the person appointed shall serve until the organizational meeting of the Council following the
election. At the regular municipal election, a person shall be elected to serve the unexpired term,
said term to begin on the date of the organizational meeting. A vacancy occurring otherwise shall
be filled for the unexpired term."
SECTION 5.9.(c) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Village of
Foxfire Village in 2027. The terms of office for the two council members serving on the effective
date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by one year. The
terms of office for the three council members serving on the effective date of this section whose
terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be extended by one year. Regular municipal elections in the
Village of Foxfire Village shall resume in even-numbered years beginning in 2028 with the same
staggering of terms as when elections were conducted in odd-numbered years.
VILLAGE OF PINEHURST
SECTION 5.10.(a) Section III of the Charter of the Village of Pinehurst, being that
Charter approved by the Municipal Board of Control on May 8, 1980, as amended by Ordinance
Number 95-17 and by Ordinance Number 01-16, reads as rewritten:
"The Village Council shall consist of four Councilmembers and one Mayor. All
Councilmembers and the Mayor shall serve staggered terms of four years. Non-partisan, plurality
municipal elections shall be held by the County Board of Elections pursuant to Article Regular
municipal elections shall be held at the time of the general election in each even-numbered year.
Councilmembers and the Mayor shall be elected on a partisan basis. The primary and election
shall be held and conducted in accordance with the general laws governing primaries and
elections for county officers. Except as otherwise provided, the election shall be conducted in
accordance with Articles 23 and 24 of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes of North Carolina and
shall be conducted as provided in G.S. 163-292.Statutes.
At the regular municipal elections to be held in 2003, and every four years thereafter, the two
candidates for Village Council who receive the highest number of votes shall be elected to four-
year terms, while the candidate for Mayor who receives the highest number of votes shall be
elected to the office of Mayor for a four-year term. At the regular municipal election to be held
Page 10 Session Law 2026-25 Senate Bill 876

in 2005, and every four years thereafter, the two candidates for Village Council who receive the
highest number of votes shall be elected for four year terms.
The Mayor has the right to vote on all matters before the Council. The Mayor has no right to
break a tie vote in which he participated.
Any candidate seeking nomination by petition for municipal office shall comply with the
requirements of Article 11 of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes of North Carolina, except that
the date and time petitions must be filed with the county board of elections shall be in accordance
with G.S. 163-122(a)(3)."
SECTION 5.10.(b) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Village of
Pinehurst in 2027. The terms of office for the mayor and two councilmembers serving on the
effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by one year.
The terms of office for the two councilmembers serving on the effective date of this section
whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be extended by one year. Regular municipal elections
in the Village of Pinehurst shall resume in even-numbered years beginning in 2028 with the same
staggering of terms as when elections were conducted in odd-numbered years.
VILLAGE OF WHISPERING PINES
SECTION 5.11.(a) Article III of the Charter of the Village of Whispering Pines,
being S.L. 2008-105, reads as rewritten:
"ARTICLE III. ELECTIONS.
"Section 3.1. Regular Municipal Elections. Regular municipal elections shall be held at the
time of the general election in each odd-numbered year even-numbered year. The Village Council
shall be elected on a partisan basis. The primary and election shall be held and conducted in
accordance with the general laws governing primaries and elections for county officers. Except
as otherwise provided, the election shall be conducted in accordance with the uniform municipal
election laws of North Carolina. The Village Council shall be elected by the voters of the entire
Village on an at-large basis. The municipal elections in the Village of Whispering Pines shall be
nonpartisan and decided by a simple plurality.
"Sec. 3.2. Election of the Village Council. The terms of the five members elected to the
Village Council shall be staggered. At the regular municipal election to be held in 2009, and
every four years thereafter, three council members shall be elected to serve four-year terms to fill
the seats of those officers whose terms are then expiring. In the regular municipal election of
2011, and every four-years thereafter, two council members shall be elected to serve four-year
terms to fill the seats of those officers whose terms are then expiring.
…
"Sec. 3.4. Unaffiliated Candidates. Any candidate seeking nomination by petition for
municipal office shall comply with the requirements of Article 11 of Chapter 163 of the General
Statutes of North Carolina, except that the date and time petitions must be filed with the county
board of elections shall be in accordance with G.S. 163-122(a)(3)."
SECTION 5.11.(b) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Village of
Whispering Pines in 2027. The terms of office for the two council members serving on the
effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by one year.
The terms of office for the three council members serving on the effective date of this section
whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be extended by one year. Regular municipal elections
in the Village of Whispering Pines shall resume in even-numbered years beginning in 2028 with
the same staggering of terms as when elections were conducted in odd-numbered years.
PART VI. MOORE COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION – PARTISAN ELECTIONS
SECTION 6.(a) Section 2(a) of S.L. 2015-244 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 2.(a) Notwithstanding Chapter 389 of the 1997 Session Laws, effective the first
Monday in December 2016, the Board of Education of Moore County shall consist of seven
Senate Bill 876 Session Law 2026-25 Page 11

members. Notwithstanding G.S. 115C-37, all members shall be elected on a partisan basis at the
time of the general election in each even-numbered year as terms expire. Candidates for election
to the Board of Education of Moore County shall be nominated at the same time and in the same
manner as other county officers. Members shall take office on the first Monday in December
following the election. Members shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified.
Except as otherwise provided, elections shall be conducted in accordance with Chapters 115C
and 163 of the General Statutes."
SECTION 6.(b) Section 2(d) of S.L. 2015-244 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 2.(d) Members shall reside in and represent the districts, but all members are
shall be elected by the voters of the county at large by the nonpartisan primary and election
method, all as previously provided by law. large. No person shall be eligible to file for or be
elected to the Board of Education of Moore County unless the person is a qualified voter and
resident of the residency district in which the person seeks to be elected. Vacancies on the Moore
County Board of Education shall be filled in accordance with G.S. 115C-37(f).G.S. 115C-37.1."
SECTION 6.(c) This section does not affect the term of office for any person elected
in 2026 to the Moore County Board of Education. Any vacancy on the Moore County Board of
Education for a member elected in 2026 shall be filled by appointment by the remaining members
of the Moore County Board of Education to serve the remainder of the unexpired term. When a
vacancy occurs in a seat elected from a residency district, the successor shall be selected from
the residency district of the vacating member. Each member of the Moore County Board of
Education elected in 2026, or any member appointed to fill a vacancy for a member elected in
2026, shall serve until a successor has been elected and qualified.
SECTION 6.(d) G.S. 115C-37.1(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) This section shall apply only to the Asheboro City Board of Education, the Hickory
City Board of Education and the Newton-Conover City Board of Education and in the following
counties: Alexander, Alleghany, Ashe, Beaufort, Brunswick, Burke, Cabarrus, Caldwell,
Carteret, Catawba, Cherokee, Clay, Columbus, Craven, Dare, Davie, Forsyth, Gaston, Graham,
Harnett, Henderson, Hyde, Iredell, Johnston, Lee, Lincoln, Madison, McDowell, Mitchell,
Moore, New Hanover, Onslow, Pamlico, Pender, Polk, Rowan, Rutherford, Scotland, Stanly,
Stokes, Surry, Vance, Washington, and Yancey."
SECTION 6.(e) This section becomes effective the first Monday in December 2028.
In order to implement this section, the 2028 elections shall be conducted as if the provisions of
this section were already in effect.
PART VII. REPEAL MOORE COUNTY SCHOOL BOARD POLICE
SECTION 7.(a) S.L. 2010-64 is repealed.
SECTION 7.(b) This section becomes effective January 1, 2027.
PART VIII. MOORE COUNTY PUBLIC SAFETY FUNDS
SECTION 8.(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, Moore County may
expend general funds up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), other than ad valorem
property tax revenues, for the purpose of complying with minimum construction standards of the
Department of Transportation in areas damaged due to the effects of Tropical Storm Chantal that
are critical to the provision of public safety services and emergency services to the county.
SECTION 8.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and expires June 30,
2028.
PART IX. ADD CHOWAN COUNTY TO ALBEMARLE DISTRICT JAIL
COMMISSION
SECTION 9.(a) Section 2 of Chapter 341 of the 1971 Session Laws reads as
rewritten:
Page 12 Session Law 2026-25 Senate Bill 876

"Sec. 2. Article 7 of Chapter 153 of the General Statutes is hereby amended by adding a new
section to read as follows:
"G.S. 153-53.8. District or regional jail commission. – When two or more units of local
government have entered into an agreement as authorized in G.S. 153-53.7, the governing bodies
shall create a jail commission composed of representatives from each participating unit appointed
by the governing board of each unit. The number of members and their apportionment among
the participating units shall be mutually agreed upon by the participating units, but if no
agreement can be reached, each participating unit shall be allotted two members. Each member
shall be appointed for a term of two years, and shall serve until his or her successor is appointed
and qualified. Vacancies occurring for any cause shall be filled by appointment by the governing
body which made the original appointment in which the vacancy occurs.
The jail commission shall be the administrative authority of the confinement facility, and
shall adopt rules and regulations for the operation of the facility which are not in conflict with
law.
The jail commission shall have all of the following powers and duties:
(1) within Within the limits of funds made available to it, and when authorized by
the governing bodies of the local units, to enter into contracts in the name of
the respective units for the construction and operation of the confinement
facilities;facilities.
(2) to To employ such personnel as may be necessary to carry out its work;work.
(3) to To accept, receive and disburse in furtherance of its functions any funds,
grants and services made available by the State or federal governments and
their agencies, any municipality or county and by private sources. All fiscal
procedures shall be in accordance with the laws applicable to the participating
units, and the jail commission shall prepare each year a report of its activities
including a financial statement, and distribute the report to each participating
unit.
The jail commission shall organize by electing a chairman, chair, vice chairman chair, and
secretary-treasurer. The secretary-treasurer shall provide a surety bond payable to the State of
North Carolina in such amount and on such terms as the jail commission may require. The jail
commission shall hold one regular meeting each month and may call special meetings at the
request of the chairman chair or any two members.
The jail commission shall perform such duties and functions relating to the confinement
facility as the governing bodies of the participating units by joint resolution may direct. Members
of the jail commission shall receive such compensation as the governing bodies of the
participating units may fix by resolution. The amount of financial contribution of each
participating unit to the jail commission shall be determined by a percentage proportion that the
population of each participating unit bears to the total population of all participating units as
indicated by the latest federal census of population.
This section shall apply only to the following counties: Camden, Chowan, Pasquotank, and
Perquimans.""
SECTION 9.(b) Section 2.1 of Chapter 341 of the 1971 Session Laws reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 2.1. The jail commission for Camden, Chowan, Pasquotank, and Perquimans and
Camden Counties shall be composed of one member from Camden, one member from Chowan,
two members from Pasquotank, and one member from Perquimans and one member from
Camden.Perquimans."
SECTION 9.(c) Section 2 of Chapter 371 of the 1991 Session Laws reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 2. This act applies only to the Albemarle District Jail facility in Elizabeth City and to
Camden, Chowan, Pasquotank, and Perquimans Counties, which place prisoners in that facility."
Senate Bill 876 Session Law 2026-25 Page 13

SECTION 9.(d) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026.
PART X. CLAREMONT BUILDING HEIGHT LIMITATIONS
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 160D of the General
Statutes, the City of Claremont may establish a maximum building height on any building within
the corporate limits of the City of Claremont not to exceed 125 feet. For purposes of this section,
"building height" shall mean the vertical distance measured from the average grade to the highest
point of the coping of a flat roof, to the deck line of a mansard roof, or to the mean height level
between the eaves and ridge of a gable, hip, or gambrel roof. The height limitation created by
this section does not apply to spires, belfries, cupolas, antennas, water tanks, ventilators,
chimneys, or other appurtenances usually required to be placed above the roof level and not
intended for human occupancy. This section does not apply to (i) buildings erected prior to July
1, 2026, (ii) hospitals, (iii) churches, (iv) cultural performing arts centers, or (v) government
buildings. Variances to this section may be granted by the council.
PART XI. HARNETT COUNTY JETPORT
SECTION 11.(a) G.S. 160D-904 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-904. Airport zoning.
Any local government may enact and enforce airport zoning regulations pursuant to this
Chapter or as authorized by Article 4 of Chapter 63 of the General Statutes. G.S. 160D-601(d)
shall not apply to airport zoning regulations. Airport zoning regulations for real property within
6 miles of any cargo airport complex site subject to regulation by the North Carolina Global
TransPark Authority are governed by G.S. 63A-18."
SECTION 11.(b) This Part applies only to Harnett County.
PART XII. CLAYTON VOLUNTARY ANNEXATION
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including any interlocal
agreement impacting area annexed in Wake County, upon adoption of an ordinance annexing
property in accordance with Part 4 of Article 4A of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes or upon
entering into an annexation agreement in accordance with Part 6 of Article 4A of Chapter 160A
of the General Statutes, the Town of Clayton shall make available to the annexed area each major
municipal service on substantially the same basis and in the same manner as such services are
provided within the rest of the Town of Clayton on the date of annexation.
PART XIII. PREVENT HISTORIC PRESERVATION COMMISSION AND HISTORIC
OVERLAY DISTRICTS IN SOUTHPORT
SECTION 13.(a) The Southport Historic Preservation Commission is abolished.
SECTION 13.(b) Notwithstanding G.S. 160D-103, G.S. 160D-303, and Part 4 of
Article 9 of Chapter 160D of the General Statutes, the City of Southport shall not have authority
to do any of the following:
(1) Designate a historic preservation commission.
(2) Create a new historic district or historic overlay district in the City.
(3) Expand a historic district or historic overlay district in the City.
SECTION 13.(c) Any historic district in the City of Southport that is in effect on the
effective date of this section shall remain in effect but shall not be expanded.
PART XIV. LELAND ANNEXATION AUTHORITY
SECTION 14. Notwithstanding G.S. 160A-58.1(b)(1), as enacted by S.L. 2022-26,
the Town of Leland may voluntarily annex territory up to 3 miles from the primary corporate
limits of the Town if either of the following applies:
(1) The property is owned by the Town of Leland.
Page 14 Session Law 2026-25 Senate Bill 876

(2) A petition for annexation has been received by the Town no later than July 1,
2026, and the territory described in the petition for annexation does not extend
west of Maco Road NE or Ocean Highway East in Brunswick County.
PART XV. ADD CERTAIN DESCRIBED NORTH CAROLINA DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION RIGHT-OF-WAY TO THE CORPORATE LIMITS OF THE
TOWN OF FRANKLINTON
SECTION 15.(a) The corporate limits of the Town of Franklinton are extended to
include the entirety of the North Carolina Department of Transportation right-of-way for State
Road 1297 (North Main Street), beginning at the intersection of Pine Street and North Main
Street and extending northward to the intersection of North Main Street and U.S. Highway 1,
described as follows:
All that certain tract or parcel of land lying and being in the Franklinton Township, Franklin
County, North Carolina, and being more particularly described as follows: Beginning at the
southeast corner of Parcel ID 041448, as shown on Plat Book 2010, Page 138 of the Franklin
County Register of Deeds, said point also being located at the north side of the intersection of
Pine Street and State Road 1297, also known as North Main Street; thence proceeding
east-southeast a distance of approximately 83 feet across the North Carolina Department of
Transportation maintained right-of-way of North Main Street to the northwest corner of Parcel
ID 007669, as described in Deed Book 1595, Page 691; thence proceeding northward along and
with the eastern boundary of the North Main Street right-of-way for a distance of approximately
2,114 feet to the northwest corner of Parcel ID 010199, as shown on Plat Book 2, Page 197;
thence turning and continuing southwest across the North Carolina Department of Transportation
right-of-way to the corner of Parcel ID 007112, as described in Deed Book 953, Page 509; thence
continuing southwest a distance of approximately 176 feet to the southwest corner of said Parcel
ID 007112; thence turning and proceeding approximately 75 feet east to the southeast corner of
Parcel ID 007112; thence continuing southward along the western boundary of the North
Carolina Department of Transportation right-of-way of North Main Street a distance of
approximately 1,820 feet to the point and place of beginning at the southeast corner of Parcel ID
041448.
SECTION 15.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2027.
PART XVI. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 16. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 2nd day of July, 2026.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Destin Hall
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Senate Bill 876 Session Law 2026-25 Page 15